Illinois, session 104th, SB3369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 33-1 and 33-8 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/33-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 33-1)7    Sec. 33-1. Bribery. A person commits bribery when: 8        (a) With intent to influence or for the performance of 9    any act related to the employment or function of any 10    public officer, public employee, juror or witness, he or 11    she promises or tenders or promised or tendered to that 12    person any property or personal advantage which he or she 13    is not authorized by law to accept; or14        (b) With intent to influence or for the performance of 15    any act related to the employment or function of any 16    public officer, public employee, juror or witness, he or 17    she promises or tenders or promised or tendered to one 18    whom he or she believes to be a public officer, public 19    employee, juror or witness, any property or personal 20    advantage which a public officer, public employee, juror 21    or witness would not be authorized by law to accept; or22        (c) With intent to cause any person to influence or be 23    influenced by the performance of any act related to the   SB3369- 2 -LRB104 18799 RLC 32242 b1    employment or function of any public officer, public 2    employee, juror or witness, he or she promises or tenders 3    or promised or tendered to that person any property or 4    personal advantage which he or she is not authorized by 5    law to accept; or6        (d) He or she receives, retains or agrees to accept 7    any property or personal advantage which he or she is not 8    authorized by law to accept knowing that the property or 9    personal advantage was promised or tendered with intent to 10    cause him or her to influence or for the performance of any 11    act related to the employment or function of any public 12    officer, public employee, juror or witness; or13        (e) He or she solicits, receives, retains, or agrees 14    to accept any property or personal advantage pursuant to 15    an understanding that he or she shall improperly influence 16    or attempt to improperly influence the performance of any 17    act related to the employment or function of any public 18    officer, public employee, juror or witness.19    As used in this Section, "tenders" means any delivery or 20proffer made with the requisite intent.21    This Section does not apply to the promise, tender, 22acceptance, or receipt of any campaign contributions that are 23permissible under the Election Code. 24    Sentence. Bribery is a Class 2 felony. 25(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.)   SB3369- 3 -LRB104 18799 RLC 32242 b1    (720 ILCS 5/33-8)2    Sec. 33-8. Legislative misconduct.3    (a) A member of the General Assembly commits legislative 4misconduct when he or she knowingly accepts or receives, 5directly or indirectly, any money or other valuable thing, 6from any corporation, company or person, for any vote or 7influence he or she may give or withhold or has given or 8withheld on any bill, resolution or appropriation, or for any 9other official act.10    (a-5) This Section does not apply to the acceptance or 11receipt by a member of the General Assembly or his or her 12political action committee of any campaign contributions that 13are permissible under the Election Code. 14    (b) Sentence. Legislative misconduct is a Class 3 felony. 15(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13.)